Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-607
Conservation and peace officers; duty to arrest; powers.

It shall be the duty of every conservation officer and any other peace officer to arrest any person whom he or she has reason to believe has committed a violation of the Game Law and, with or without a warrant, to open, enter, and examine all camps, wagons, cars, stages, tents, packs, warehouses, stores, outhouses, stables, barns and other places, boxes, barrels, and packages where he or she has reason to believe any game, fish, or raw furs, taken or held in violation of the Game Law, are to be found and to seize the same, except that a dwelling house actually occupied can be entered only upon authority of a search warrant.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 297;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 87.